Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.0357

Juvenile offender sentencing standards.

DESCRIPTION AND OFFENSE CATEGORY

juvenile

disposition

offense

category

description (rcw citation)

juvenile disposition

category for

attempt, bailjump,

conspiracy, or

solicitation

Arson and Malicious Mischief

A

Arson 1 (9A.48.020)

B+

B

Arson 2 (9A.48.030)

C

C

Reckless Burning 1 (9A.48.040)

D

D

Reckless Burning 2 (9A.48.050)

E

B

Malicious Mischief 1 (9A.48.070)

C

C

Malicious Mischief 2 (9A.48.080)

D

D

Malicious Mischief 3 (9A.48.090)

E

E

Tampering with Fire Alarm Apparatus (9.40.100)

E

E

Tampering with Fire Alarm Apparatus with Intent to Commit Arson (9.40.105)

E

A

Possession of Incendiary Device (9.40.120)

B+

Assault and Other Crimes Involving Physical Harm

A

Assault 1 (9A.36.011)

B+

B+

Assault 2 (9A.36.021)

C+

C+

Assault 3 (9A.36.031)

D+

D+

Assault 4 (9A.36.041)

E

B+

Drive-By Shooting (9A.36.045) committed at age 15 or under

C+

A++

Drive-By Shooting (9A.36.045) committed at age 16 or 17

A

D+

Reckless Endangerment (9A.36.050)

E

C+

Promoting Suicide Attempt (9A.36.060)

D+

D+

Coercion (9A.36.070)

E

C+

Custodial Assault (9A.36.100)

D+

Burglary and Trespass

B+

Burglary 1 (9A.52.020) committed at

age 15 or under

C+

A-

Burglary 1 (9A.52.020) committed at

age 16 or 17

B+

B

Residential Burglary (9A.52.025)

C

B

Burglary 2 (9A.52.030)

C

D

Burglary Tools (Possession of) (9A.52.060)

E

D

Criminal Trespass 1 (9A.52.070)

E

E

Criminal Trespass 2 (9A.52.080)

E

C

Mineral Trespass (78.44.330)

C

C

Vehicle Prowling 1 (9A.52.095)

D

D

Vehicle Prowling 2 (9A.52.100)

E

Drugs

E

Possession/Consumption of Alcohol (66.44.270)

E

C

Illegally Obtaining Legend Drug (69.41.020)

D

C+

Sale, Delivery, Possession of Legend Drug with Intent to Sell (69.41.030(2)(a))

D+

E

Possession of Legend

Drug (69.41.030(2)(b))

E

B+

Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Narcotic, Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam Sale (69.50.401(2) (a) or (b))

B+

C

Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Nonnarcotic Sale (69.50.401(2)(c))

C

E

Possession of Cannabis <40 grams (69.50.4014)

E

C

Fraudulently Obtaining Controlled Substance (69.50.403)

C

C+

Sale of Controlled Substance for Profit (69.50.410)

C+

E

Unlawful Inhalation (9.47A.020)

E

B

Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Narcotic, Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam Counterfeit Substances (69.50.4011(2) (a) or (b))

B

C

Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Nonnarcotic Counterfeit Substances (69.50.4011(2) (c), (d), or (e))

C

E

Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Possession of a Controlled Substance (69.50.4013)

E

C

Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Possession of a Controlled Substance (69.50.4012)

C

Firearms and Weapons

B

Theft of Firearm (9A.56.300)

C

B

Possession of Stolen Firearm

(9A.56.310)

C

E

Carrying Loaded Pistol Without Permit (9.41.050)

E

C

Possession of Firearms by Minor (<18) (9.41.040(2)(a) (v))

C

D+

Possession of Dangerous Weapon (9.41.250)

E

D

Intimidating Another Person by use of Weapon (9.41.270)

E

Homicide

A+

Murder 1 (9A.32.030)

A

A+

Murder 2 (9A.32.050)

B+

B+

Manslaughter 1 (9A.32.060)

C+

C+

Manslaughter 2 (9A.32.070)

D+

B+

Vehicular Homicide (46.61.520)

C+

Kidnapping

A

Kidnap 1 (9A.40.020)

B+

B+

Kidnap 2 (9A.40.030)

C+

C+

Unlawful Imprisonment (9A.40.040)

D+

Obstructing Governmental Operation

D

Obstructing a Law Enforcement Officer (9A.76.020)

E

E

Resisting Arrest (9A.76.040)

E

B

Introducing Contraband 1 (9A.76.140)

C

C

Introducing Contraband 2 (9A.76.150)

D

E

Introducing Contraband 3 (9A.76.160)

E

B+

Intimidating a Public Servant (9A.76.180)

C+

B+

Intimidating a Witness (9A.72.110)

C+

Public Disturbance

C+

Criminal Mischief with Weapon (9A.84.010(2)(b))

D+

D+

Criminal Mischief Without Weapon (9A.84.010(2)(a))

E

E

Failure to Disperse (9A.84.020)

E

E

Disorderly Conduct (9A.84.030)

E

Sex Crimes

A

Rape 1 (9A.44.040)

B+

B++

Rape 2 (9A.44.050) committed at age 14 or under

B+

A-

Rape 2 (9A.44.050) committed at age 15 through age 17

B+

C+

Rape 3 (9A.44.060)

D+

B++

Rape of a Child 1 (9A.44.073)

committed at age 14 or under

B+

A-

Rape of a Child 1 (9A.44.073)

committed at age 15

B+

B+

Rape of a Child 2 (9A.44.076)

C+

B

Incest 1 (9A.64.020(1))

C

C

Incest 2 (9A.64.020(2))

D

D+

Indecent Exposure (Victim <14) (9A.88.010)

E

E

Indecent Exposure (Victim 14 or over) (9A.88.010)

E

B+

Promoting Prostitution 1 (9A.88.070)

C+

C+

Promoting Prostitution 2 (9A.88.080)

D+

E

O & A (Prostitution) (9A.88.030)

E

B+

Indecent Liberties (9A.44.100)

C+

B++

Child Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) committed at age 14 or under

B+

A-

Child Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) committed at age 15 through age 17

B+

B

Child Molestation 2 (9A.44.086)

C+

C

Failure to Register as a Sex Offender (9A.44.132)

D

Theft, Robbery, Extortion, and Forgery

B

Theft 1 (9A.56.030)

C

C

Theft 2 (9A.56.040)

D

D

Theft 3 (9A.56.050)

E

B

Theft of Livestock 1 and 2 (9A.56.080 and 9A.56.083)

C

C

Forgery (9A.60.020)

D

A

Robbery 1 (9A.56.200) committed at

age 15 or under

B+

A++

Robbery 1 (9A.56.200) committed at

age 16 or 17

A

B+

Robbery 2 (9A.56.210)

C+

B+

Extortion 1 (9A.56.120)

C+

C+

Extortion 2 (9A.56.130)

D+

C

Identity Theft 1 (9.35.020(2))

D

D

Identity Theft 2 (9.35.020(3))

E

D

Improperly Obtaining Financial Information (9.35.010)

E

B

Possession of a Stolen Vehicle (9A.56.068)

C

B

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (9A.56.150)

C

C

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (9A.56.160)

D

D

Possession of Stolen Property 3 (9A.56.170)

E

B

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1 (9A.56.070)

C

C

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2 (9A.56.075)

D

B

Theft of a Motor Vehicle (9A.56.065)

C

Motor Vehicle Related Crimes

E

Driving Without a License (46.20.005)

E

B+

Hit and Run - Death (46.52.020(4)(a))

C+

C

Hit and Run - Injury (46.52.020(4)(b))

D

D

Hit and Run-Attended (46.52.020(5))

E

E

Hit and Run-Unattended (46.52.010)

E

C

Vehicular Assault (46.61.522)

D

C

Attempting to Elude Pursuing Police Vehicle (46.61.024)

D

E

Reckless Driving (46.61.500)

E

D

Driving While Under the Influence (46.61.502 and 46.61.504)

E

B+

Felony Driving While Under the Influence (46.61.502(6))

B

B+

Felony Physical Control of a Vehicle While Under the Influence (46.61.504(6))

B

Other

B

Animal Cruelty 1 (16.52.205)

C

B

Bomb Threat (9.61.160)

C

C

Escape 11 (9A.76.110)

C

C

Escape 21 (9A.76.120)

C

D

Escape 3 (9A.76.130)

E

E

Obscene, Harassing, Etc., Phone Calls (9.61.230)

E

A

Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class A Felony

B+

B

Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class B Felony

C

C

Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class C Felony

D

D

Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Gross Misdemeanor

E

E

Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Misdemeanor

E

V

Violation of Order of Restitution, Community Supervision, or Confinement (13.40.200)2

V

1Escape 1 and 2 and Attempted Escape 1 and 2 are classed as C offenses and the standard range is established as follows:

1st escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 28 days confinement

2nd escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 8 weeks confinement

3rd and subsequent escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 12 weeks confinement

2If the court finds that a respondent has violated terms of an order, it may impose a penalty of up to 30 days of confinement.

JUVENILE SENTENCING STANDARDS

This schedule must be used for juvenile offenders. The court may select sentencing option A, B, C, or D.

OPTION A

JUVENILE OFFENDER SENTENCING GRID

STANDARD RANGE

A++

129 to 260 weeks for all category A++ offenses

A+

180 weeks to age 21 for all category A+ offenses

A

103-129 weeks for all category A offenses

A-

30-40 weeks

52-65 weeks

80-100 weeks

103-129 weeks

103-129 weeks

B++

15-36 weeks

52-65 weeks

80-100 weeks

103-129 weeks

103-129 weeks

CURRENT

B+

15-36 weeks

15-36 weeks

52-65 weeks

80-100 weeks

103-129 weeks

OFFENSE

B

LS

LS

15-36 weeks

15-36 weeks

52-65 weeks

CATEGORY

C+

LS

LS

LS

15-36 weeks

15-36 weeks

C

LS

LS

LS

LS

15-36 weeks

D+

LS

LS

LS

LS

LS

D

LS

LS

LS

LS

LS

E

LS

LS

LS

LS

LS

PRIOR

0

1

2

3

4 or more

ADJUDICATIONS

NOTE: References in the grid to days or weeks mean periods of confinement. "LS" means "local sanctions" as defined in RCW 13.40.020.

(1) The vertical axis of the grid is the current offense category. The current offense category is determined by the offense of adjudication.

(2) The horizontal axis of the grid is the number of prior adjudications included in the juvenile's criminal history. Each prior felony adjudication shall count as one point. Each prior violation, misdemeanor, and gross misdemeanor adjudication shall count as 1/4 point. Fractional points shall be rounded down.

(3) The standard range disposition for each offense is determined by the intersection of the column defined by the prior adjudications and the row defined by the current offense category.

(4) RCW 13.40.180 applies if the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense.

(5) A current offense that is a violation is equivalent to an offense category of E. However, a disposition for a violation shall not include confinement.

OR

OPTION B

SUSPENDED DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

(1) If the offender is subject to a standard range disposition involving confinement by the department, the court may impose the standard range and suspend the disposition on condition that the offender comply with one or more local sanctions and any educational or treatment requirement. The treatment programs provided to the offender must be either research-based best practice programs as identified by the Washington state institute for public policy or the joint legislative audit and review committee, or for chemical dependency treatment programs or services, they must be evidence-based or research-based best practice programs. For the purposes of this subsection:

(a) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has had multiple site random controlled trials across heterogeneous populations demonstrating that the program or practice is effective for the population; and

(b) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has some research demonstrating effectiveness, but that does not yet meet the standard of evidence-based practices.

(2) If the offender fails to comply with the suspended disposition, the court may impose sanctions pursuant to RCW 13.40.200 or may revoke the suspended disposition and order the disposition's execution.

(3) An offender is ineligible for the suspended disposition option under this section if the offender:

(a) Is adjudicated of an A+ or A++ offense;

(b) Is fourteen years of age or older and is adjudicated of one or more of the following offenses:

(i) A class A offense, or an attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit a class A offense;

(ii) Manslaughter in the first degree (RCW 9A.32.060);

(iii) Assault in the second degree (RCW 9A.36.021), extortion in the first degree (RCW 9A.56.120), kidnapping in the second degree (RCW 9A.40.030), drive-by shooting (RCW 9A.36.045), vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), hit and run death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a)), or manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070); or

(iv) Violation of the uniform controlled substances act (RCW 69.50.401(2) (a) and (b)), when the offense includes infliction of bodily harm upon another or when during the commission or immediate withdrawal from the offense the respondent was armed with a deadly weapon;

(c) Is ordered to serve a disposition for a firearm violation under RCW 13.40.193;

(d) Is adjudicated of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; or

(e) Has a prior option B disposition.

OR

OPTION C

CHEMICAL DEPENDENCY/MENTAL HEALTH DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

If the juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not committed a B++ or B+ offense, the court may impose a disposition under RCW 13.40.160(4) and 13.40.165.

OR

OPTION D

MANIFEST INJUSTICE

If the court determines that a disposition under option A, B, or C would effectuate a manifest injustice, the court shall impose a disposition outside the standard range under RCW 13.40.160(2).

[ 2023 c 295 s 8. Prior: 2022 c 268 s 37; (2022 c 268 s 36 expired July 1, 2023); 2022 c 16 s 9; (2022 c 16 s 8 expired July 1, 2023); 2021 c 311 s 16; 2020 c 18 s 8; 2019 c 322 s 8; 2018 c 162 s 3; 2016 c 106 s 2; 2013 c 20 s 2; 2012 c 177 s 4; prior: 2008 c 230 s 3; 2008 c 158 s 1; 2007 c 199 s 11; 2006 c 73 s 14; 2004 c 117 s 1; prior: 2003 c 378 s 2; 2003 c 335 s 6; 2003 c 53 s 97; prior: 2002 c 324 s 3; 2002 c 175 s 20; 2001 c 217 s 13; 2000 c 66 s 3; 1998 c 290 s 5; prior: 1997 c 338 s 12; (1997 c 338 s 11 expired July 1, 1998); 1997 c 66 s 6; 1996 c 205 s 6; 1995 c 395 s 3; 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 522; 1989 c 407 s 7.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2023 c 295: See note following RCW 9.41.040.

Expiration date—2022 c 268 s 36: "Section 36 of this act expires July 1, 2023." [ 2022 c 268 s 48.]

Effective dates—2022 c 268: See note following RCW 7.105.010.

Effective date—2022 c 16 ss 5, 9, 86, and 88: See note following RCW 69.50.4013.

Expiration date—2022 c 16 ss 4, 8, 85, and 87: See note following RCW 69.50.4013.

Intent—Finding—2022 c 16: See note following RCW 69.50.101.

Effective date—2021 c 311 ss 1-11 and 13-21: See note following RCW 71.24.115.

Explanatory statement—2020 c 18: See note following RCW 43.79A.040.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 322: See note following RCW 72.01.410.

Report to legislature—2019 c 322 ss 2-6; 2018 c 162: See RCW 13.04.800.

Effective date—2013 c 20: See note following RCW 9A.84.010.

Delayed effective date—2008 c 230 ss 1-3: See note following RCW 9A.44.130.

Findings—Intent—Short title—2007 c 199: See notes following RCW 9A.56.065.

Effective date—2006 c 73: See note following RCW 46.61.502.

Effective date—2004 c 117: "This act takes effect July 1, 2004." [ 2004 c 117 s 3.]

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Study and report—2002 c 324: See note following RCW 9A.56.070.

Effective date—2002 c 175: See note following RCW 7.80.130.

Captions not law—2001 c 217: See note following RCW 9.35.005.

Application—Effective date—Severability—1998 c 290: See notes following RCW 69.50.401.

Severability—Effective dates—1997 c 338: See notes following RCW 5.60.060.

Finding—Evaluation—Report—1997 c 338: "The legislature finds it critical to evaluate the effectiveness of the revisions made in this act to juvenile sentencing for purposes of measuring improvements in public safety and reduction of recidivism.

To accomplish this evaluation, the Washington state institute for public policy shall conduct a study of the sentencing revisions. The study shall: (1) Be conducted starting January 1, 2001; (2) examine whether the revisions have affected the rate of initial offense commission and recidivism; (3) determine the impacts of the revisions by age, race, and gender impacts of the revisions; (4) compare the utilization and effectiveness of sentencing alternatives and manifest injustice determinations before and after the revisions; and (5) examine the impact and effectiveness of changes made in the exclusive original jurisdiction of juvenile court over juvenile offenders.

The institute shall report the results of the study to the governor and legislature not later than July 1, 2002." [ 1997 c 338 s 59.]

Finding—Intent—Severability—1994 sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.70.540.